www/common/latex/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-sh-cyrl.hyp.txt
на-дно
на-тка
на-тка-ти
на-тка-ше
о-дно
о-тка
о-тка-ти
о-тка-ше
по-дно
по-дне
по-тки
по-тку
по-тка
по-тке
у-дно
и-где
и-гдје
сву-где
све-где
сву-гдје
све-гдје
по-не-где
по-не-гдје
и-зби
и-зба
и-збе
и-зби-ци
и-зби-ца
и-зби-це
и-звит
и-зим
изо-ба-ри
изо-ба-ру
изо-ба-ра
изо-ба-ре
и-скок
и-ско-ку
и-ско-ка
и-скон
и-ско-ни
и-ско-ну
и-ско-на
и-скри
и-скру
и-скра
и-скре
и-скрав
и-спод
и-спо-да
и-стри
и-стро
и-стру
и-стра
и-стре
на-ји
на-јо
на-ју
на-ја
на-је
на-јам
на-јест
о-браз
о-брет
о-дви-ка
о-дран
о-дра-ти
пре-двој
ра-зми
ра-змо
ра-зму
ра-зма
ра-зме
ра-зни
ра-зно
ра-зну
ра-зна
ра-зне
ра-склоп
ра-спе-ло
ра-спе-лу
ра-спе-ла
ра-спе-ћу
ра-спе-ћа
ра-спе-ће
ра-сти
ра-сту
ра-ста
ра-сте
ра-стом
ра-стер
ра-шћи
ра-шћо
ра-шћу
ра-шћа
ра-шће
у-зни
у-зно
у-зна
у-зник
у-зрок
у-ски
у-ско
у-ску
у-ска
у-ске
ус-кос
у-спио
у-спео
у-спор
у-шћу
у-шћа
у-шће
ин-те-рес
тран-су
тран-са
тран-сом
